Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2909.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-111.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State
Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-111.2. Inspection.
(a) The building official shall make all required inspections as specified in the provisions
of this code and the building official shall conduct the inspections from time to time during and
upon completion of the work for which the building official has issued a permit; and the building
official shall maintain a record of all the examinations and inspections and of all violations of this
code. In conjunction with specific construction projects, the building official may designate specific
inspection points in the course of construction which require the contractor or builder to give the
building official twenty-four (24) hours notice prior to the time when the inspections are required
to be performed. The building official shall make the inspection within forty-eight (48) hours after
the notification; weekend days and holidays are not included in the forty-eight (48) hours. The
building official, in the building official’s discretion, may conduct “virtual inspections”, or inspect
photographic evidence, to review completion of work for which the building official has issued a
permit. For the purposes of this section “virtual inspections” involve remote assessments of
properties or sites using video technology, avoiding on-site presence by inspectors.
(b) If the building official fails to perform an inspection within the time frame set forth in
this section, the contractor or builder may hire a qualified third-party inspector or the state
inspector. The building official shall accept reports of such inspections. For the purposes of this

section, a qualified third-party inspector shall mean an individual certified in accordance with the
provisions of § 23-27.3-107.6 or any professional authorized by the provisions of § 23-27.3-
108.1.4. In order to hire a qualified third-party inspector or the state inspector, the contractor or
builder shall notify the building official via email of the intent to hire a qualified third-party
inspector or the state inspector to perform the inspection at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the
hire. If the state inspector performs the inspection, the salary and operating expenses for services
provided shall be reimbursed to the state by the city or town receiving the services and shall be
deposited as general revenues.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005762
========
LC005762 - Page 2 of 3